Georgia, session 2025_26, HB554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 16 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to health of students, is amended by adding a new Code section read as follows:
"20-2-779.5.
(a) This Code section shall be known and may be cited as the 'APEX Now Program.'
H. B. 554
- 1 -

LC 49 2179
(b) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Department' means the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental
Disabilities.
(2) 'Local education agency' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section
20-2-167.1.
(3) 'Parent' means a biological parent, legal guardian, custodian, or other person with
legal authority to act on behalf of a child.
(4) 'Program' means the APEX Now Program provided for in this Code section.
(5) 'School personnel' means one or more individuals employed by a local education
agency.
(c) There is established within the department the APEX Now Program, which shall
provide support for mental health services to students and school personnel experiencing
incidents of violence, threats of violence, natural disasters, and other crisis situations and
for other purposes provided for in this Code section.
(d)(1) The department and the Department of Education shall jointly develop a mental
health crisis plan to rapidly provide mental health services to students experiencing
incidents of violence, threats of violence, natural disasters, or other crisis situations. Such
mental health crisis plan shall include provisions for:
(A) The designation of a team of individuals to serve as lead coordinators for the
deployment of mental health services in a crisis situation, and one individual to serve
as the primary leader of such team;
(B) Recommendations to make available sufficient mental health workers licensed in
this state to meet crisis needs for students, and a plan to deploy such mental health
workers when and where needed in a crisis situation; and
(C) Training that selected school personnel should receive to serve as mental health
first responders in the event of a crisis.
H. B. 554
- 2 -

LC 49 2179
(2) The department and the Department of Education shall be authorized to engage with
the Southern Regional Education Board to facilitate and support the development of the
mental health crisis plan.
(3) By January 1, 2026, the mental health crisis plan shall be made available to all local
education agencies in this state and the chairpersons of the House Committee on
Education and the Senate Education and Youth Committee.
(e)(1) The department shall establish an online and telephonic hotline that shall be
available at all times:
(A) To any school personnel in this state to refer a student for mental health evaluation
and treatment services; and
(B) To any students and school personnel in this state to report any risk of suicide or
threats of violence or actual violence for referral to the appropriate educational and law
enforcement authorities.
(2) The role of the hotline shall be limited to coordinating the provision of mental health
evaluation and treatment services and for making referrals to appropriate educational and
law enforcement authorities. The hotline shall not provide mental health evaluation or
treatment services.
(3)(A) Reports to the hotline by students shall be accepted anonymously, and the
department shall not record any personally identifiable information from students.
(B) The department shall be authorized to record personally identifiable information
from school personnel for the exclusive purpose of facilitating appropriate follow-up
efforts.
(4) The department is authorized to develop promotional materials, training programs,
and curricula to be used in training students and school personnel to recognize and report
severe mental illness and to provide such materials, programs, and curricula to local
education agencies.
H. B. 554
- 3 -

LC 49 2179
(f)(1) Students referred for mental health evaluation or treatment services under this
Code section shall be provided the opportunity to consult with an authorized mental
health professional within 24 hours of any such referral designated as urgent or within
five business days for any such referral designated as nonurgent.
(2) Local education agencies shall be authorized to designate a preferred provider to
consult with students referred for mental health evaluation or treatment services under
this Code section, and such referrals shall be made first to such preferred provider, who
may provide services to the student in person or via telehealth. If the preferred provider
is unable to consult with the student within the time provided by this subsection, the
department shall refer the student to a provider selected pursuant to this Code section who
is able to do so.
(3) Each local education agency shall designate a contact person to serve as the primary
point of contact for the department in conjunction with the program. Within 24 hours of
any referral made as part of the program, the department shall notify the designated
contact person for the local education agency of such referral.
(g)(1) The Department of Education, in coordination with the department, shall develop
and make available an electronic opt-in system for parents of minor children to provide
prospective consent pursuant to the laws of this state for mental health evaluation and
treatment services provided under the program.
(2) At the beginning of the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter, each
local education agency shall notify parents of the availability of such prospective consent
and take reasonable efforts to encourage them to complete it electronically.
(h) The Department of Administrative Services shall, in coordination with the department,
select three or more mental health telehealth providers under state-wide convenience
contracts to provide services pursuant to this Code section. Providers under state-wide
contracts established under this subsection shall also be available to be utilized by local
education agencies to provide mental health services to students and school personnel. All
H. B. 554
- 4 -

LC 49 2179
mental health services provided pursuant to such contracts shall be provided by healthcare
professionals licensed to provide such services under the laws of this state. The factors
used to select such mental health services providers shall include, but shall not be limited
to:
100 (1) A demonstrated ability to maximize payment for services from commercial insurers
101 and other third parties;
102 (2) Sufficient staffing to provide services on a state-wide basis as needed using
103 physicians, nurses, licensed professional counselors, or licensed social workers with
104 specific training in providing mental health services;
105 (3) The ability to provide services in a language fluently spoken by the student or school
106 personnel receiving such services;
107 (4) A demonstrated record of providing mental health telehealth services in elementary
108 and secondary school settings;
109 (5) Ability to use information technology to track services provided and outcomes for
110 program evaluation purposes;
111 (6) A financial model that allows the provider to serve all students, regardless of whether
112 they make a copayment or have third-party insurance coverage; and
113 (7) The flexibility to work both in an augmentation role providing additional capacity to
114 local education agencies with in-person mental health services resources and in serving
115 as a lead mental health services provider for a local education agency.
116 (i)(1) Any person or persons participating in the making of a referral pursuant to this
117 Code section or participating in any judicial proceeding or any other proceeding resulting
118 therefrom shall in so doing be immune from any civil or criminal liability that might
119 otherwise be incurred or imposed, provided that such participation pursuant to this Code
120 section or any other law is made in good faith.
H. B. 554
- 5 -

LC 49 2179
121 (2) No school personnel making a referral in good faith under this Code section shall be
122 subject to adverse employment consequences, disciplinary action, or retaliation in any
123 form by a local education agency.
124 (j) Funds appropriated for the program may be expended for the following purposes, in
125 addition to the general administration of the program, provided that such funds shall not
126 be used to reimburse any person for copayments required by a commercial insurance
127 policy:
128 (1) Purchasing equipment for the provision of mental health services by local education
129 agencies;
130 (2) Reimbursing providers for mental health services provided to students who do not
131 have coverage under government or private policies; and
132 (3) Training staff and teachers on the program and related technology.
133 (k) The department and the Department of Education shall adopt rules and regulations to
134 implement the provisions of this Code section."
135 SECTION 2.
136 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 554
- 6 -